Missouri, session 2026, SB1377.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Section 143.621, RSMo, is repealed and one new
section enacted in lieu thereof, to be known as section 143.621,
to read as follows:
143.621. 1. Sixty days after the date on which it was
mailed (one hundred fifty days if the taxpayer is outside
the United States), a notice of deficiency shall constitute
a final assessment of the amount of tax specified together
with interest, additions to tax, and penalties except only
for such amounts as to which the taxpayer has filed a
protest with the director of revenue.
2. Notwithstanding the provisions of subsection 1 of
this section to the contrary, a taxpayer that has paid a
deficiency and any interest, additions to tax, or penalties
attributable to such deficiency that is subsequently found
to be erroneous, regardless of whether such taxpayer has
timely filed a protest with the director of revenue, shall
be entitled to a refund in the amount of the deficiency and
any interest, additions to tax, or penalties attributable to
such deficiency that were paid by the taxpayer. Such refund
shall be paid as provided in sections 143.781 to 143.841.
✓